North Carolina statutes. Chapter 65. Cemeteries.
Article 9. North Carolina Cemetery Act.
§ 65-60.1.
Trustees; qualifications; examination of records; enforcement.

The term “corporate trustee” as used in this Article shall mean a bank, credit union, or trust company authorized to do business in North Carolina under the supervision of the Commissioner of Banks, Credit Union Administrator, or any other corporate entity; provided that any corporate entity other than a bank, credit union, or trust company which acts as trustee under this Article shall first be approved by the Cemetery Commission and shall be subject to supervision by the Cemetery Commission as provided herein.

Any corporate entity, other than a bank, credit union, or trust company, which desires to act as trustee for cemetery funds under this Article shall make application to the Commission for approval. The Commission shall approve the trustee when it has become satisfied that:

The applicant employs and is directed by persons who are qualified by character, experience, and financial responsibility to care for and invest the funds of others.

The applicant will perform its duties in a proper and legal manner and the trust funds and interest of the public generally will not be jeopardized.

The applicant will act as trustee for cemetery funds which will exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in the aggregate.

The applicant is authorized to do business in North Carolina and has adequate facilities to perform its duties as trustee.

Any trustee under this Article, other than a bank, credit union, or trust company under the supervision of the Commissioner of Banks, shall maintain records relative to cemetery trust funds as the Commission may by regulation prescribe. The records shall be available at the trustee’s place of business in North Carolina and shall be available at all reasonable times for examination by a representative of the Commission. The records shall be audited annually, within 90 days from the end of the trust fund’s fiscal year, by an independent certified public accountant, and a copy of the audit report shall be promptly forwarded to the Commission.

Whenever it appears that an officer, director, or employee of a trustee, other than a bank, credit union, or trust company, is dishonest, incompetent, or reckless in the management of a cemetery trust fund, the Commission may bring an action in the courts to remove the trustee and to impound the property and business of the trustee as may be reasonably necessary to protect the trust funds.

Any trustee shall invest and reinvest cemetery trust funds in the same manner as provided by law for the investment of trust funds by the clerk of the superior court; provided, however, that this subsection does not apply to a perpetual trust fund described in

G.S. 65-64

or cemetery trust funds held in a fund designated as Trust Fund “A” pursuant to

G.S. 65-64

(e), which may be invested and reinvested in accordance with

G.S. 32-71

.

History.

1977, c. 686, s. 15; 1979, c. 888, s. 9; 1995, c. 509, s. 135.3(a); 2010-102, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-102, s. 2, effective October 1, 2010, in subsections (a) through (d), inserted “credit union”; in subsection (a), substituted “shall mean a bank, credit union, or trust company” for “shall mean either a bank or trust company” and inserted “Credit Union Administrator”; and in subsection (e), inserted “this subsection does not apply to a perpetual trust fund described in

G.S. 65-64

or” and substituted “G.S. 65-64(e)” for “G.S. 65-64(c)” and “G.S. 32-71” for “G.S. 36A-2.”

§ 65-61.
Required trust fund for care and maintenance; remedy of Commission for noncompliance.

No cemetery company shall be permitted to establish, or operate if already established, a cemetery unless provision is made for the future care and maintenance of such cemetery by establishing a trust fund and designating a corporate trustee to administer said fund in accordance with a written trust agreement. If any cemetery company refuses or otherwise fails to provide or maintain an adequate care and maintenance trust fund in accordance with the provisions of this Article, the Commission, after reasonable notice, shall proceed to enforce compliance under the powers vested in it under this Article; provided any nonprofit cemetery corporation, incorporated and engaged in the cemetery business continuously since and prior to 1915 and whose current trust assets exceed seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) shall not be required to designate a corporate trustee. The trust fund agreement shall contain and include the following: name, location, and address of both the licensee and the trustee showing the date of agreement together with the amounts required deposited as stated in this Article. No person shall withdraw or transfer any portion of the corpus of the care and maintenance trust fund without first obtaining written consent from the Commission.

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 9; 1957, c. 529, s. 3; 1967, c. 1009, s. 9; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, s. 13.

§ 65-62.
Individual contracts for care and maintenance.

At the time of making a sale or receiving the initial deposit hereunder, the cemetery company shall deliver to the person to whom such sale is made, or who makes such deposit, an instrument in writing which shall specifically state that the net income of the care and maintenance trust fund shall be used solely for the care and maintenance of the cemetery, for reasonable costs of administering such care and maintenance and for reasonable costs of administering the trust fund.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1.

§ 65-63.
Requirements for perpetual care fund.

A cemetery company may not cause or permit advertising of a perpetual care fund in connection with the sale or offer for sale of its property unless the amount deposited in the fund is at least one hundred dollars ($100.00) or ten percent (10%) of the retail sale price, whichever is greater, per grave space, niche, or mausoleum crypt sold. Nothing may prohibit an individual cemetery from requiring a perpetual care deposit for grave memorial markers to be deposited in the perpetual care fund so long as the same assessment is uniformly applied to all grave memorial markers installed in the cemetery.

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 5; 1957, c. 529, s. 1; 1967, c. 1009, s. 3; 1971, c. 1149, s. 3; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1979, c. 888, s. 4; 1987, c. 488, s. 5; 1991, c. 653, s. 5; 2004-202, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-202, s. 6, effective August 17, 2004, substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00) or ten percent (10%) of the retail sale price, whichever is greater” for “forty dollars ($40.00)” in the first sentence.

§ 65-64.
Deposits to perpetual care fund.

Deposits to the care and maintenance trust fund must be made by the cemetery company holding title to the subject cemetery lands on or before the last day of the calendar month following the calendar month in which final payment is received as provided herein; however the entire amount required to be deposited into the fund shall be paid within four years from the date of any contract requiring the payment regardless of whether all amounts have been received by the cemetery company. If the cemetery company fails to make timely deposit, the Commission may levy and collect a late filing fee of one dollar ($1.00) per day for each day the deposit is delinquent on each grave space, niche or mausoleum crypt sold. The care and maintenance trust fund shall be invested and reinvested by the trustee in accordance with

G.S. 32-71

. Investments may be made through means of a common trust fund as described in

G.S. 53-163.5

. Cemetery trust funds held in a fund designated as Trust Fund “A” pursuant to G.S. 65-64(e) may be invested and reinvested in accordance with

G.S. 32-71

. The fees and other expenses of the trust fund shall be paid by the trustee from the net income thereof and may not be paid from the corpus. To the extent that the net income is not sufficient to pay the fees and other expenses, the fees and other expenses shall be paid by the cemetery company.

When a municipal, church-owned or fraternal cemetery converts to a private cemetery as defined in

G.S. 65-48

, then the cemetery shall establish and maintain a care and maintenance trust fund pursuant to this section; provided, however, the initial deposit for establishment of this trust fund shall be an amount equal to fifty dollars ($50.00) per space for all spaces either previously sold or contracted for sale in the cemetery at the time of conversion or fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), whichever sum is greater.

Repealed by 1991 (Regular Session, 1992), c. 1007, s. 35.

In each sales contract, reservation or agreement wherein burial rights are priced separately, the purchase price of the burial rights shall be the only item subject to care and maintenance trust fund deposits; but if the burial rights are not priced separately therein, the full amount of the contract, reservations or agreement shall be subject to care and maintenance trust fund deposits as provided herein, unless the purchase price of the burial rights can be determined from the accounting records of the cemetery company.

When the amount deposited in the perpetual care fund required by this Article of any cemetery company shall amount to one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000), anything in this Article to the contrary notwithstanding, the cemetery company may make all deposits thereafter either into the original perpetual care trust fund or into a separate fund established as an irrevocable trust, designated as Perpetual Care Trust Fund “A,” and invested by the trustee, in accordance with

G.S. 32-71

. Funds in a trust fund designated as Trust Fund “A” may not be invested in another cemetery company.

For special endowments for a specific lot, grave, or a family mausoleum, memorial, marker, or monument, the cemetery may set aside the full amounts received for this individual special care in a separate trust or by a deposit to a savings account in a bank, credit union, or savings and loan association located within and authorized to do business in the State; provided, however, if the licensee does not set up a separate trust or savings account for the special endowment the full amount thereof shall be deposited in Perpetual Care Trust Fund “A.”

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 10; 1957, c. 529, s. 4; 1967, c. 1009, s. 10; 1971, c. 1149, s. 5; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, s. 14; 1979, c. 888, ss. 5, 6; 1987, c. 488, ss. 3, 6; 1991, c. 653, s. 6; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1007, s. 35; 1995, c. 509, s. 135.3(b), (c); 2004-202, ss. 7, 8; 2010-102, s. 3.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-202, ss. 7, 8, effective August 17, 2004, substituted “a late filing fee” for “a penalty” in the second sentence of subsection (a); and in subsection (b), substituted “fifty dollars ($50.00)” for “ten dollars ($10.00)” and “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000)” for “twenty five thousand dollars ($25,000).”

Session Laws 2010-102, s. 3, effective October 1, 2010, in subsection (a), in the third sentence, substituted “in accordance with

G.S. 32-71

” for “in the same manner as provided by law for the investment of other trust funds by the clerk of the superior court except that such investments may be made through means of a common trust fund as described in

G.S. 36A-90

,” added the fourth sentence, and substituted “G.S. 32-71” for “G.S. 36A-2” in the fifth sentence; in the first sentence in subsection (e), substituted “with

G.S. 32-71

” for “with G.S. 36A-2, as directed by the cemetery company”; in subsection (f), inserted “credit union”; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

§ 65-65.
Trust fund; financial reports.

Within 60 days after the end of the calendar or fiscal year of the cemetery company, the trustee shall furnish adequate financial reports with respect to the care fund on forms provided by the Commission. However, the Commission may require the trustee to make such additional financial reports as it may deem advisable.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1.

§ 65-66.
Receipts from sale of personal property or services; trust account; penalties.

It shall be deemed contrary to public policy if any person or legal entity receives, holds, controls or manages funds or proceeds received from the sale of, or from a contract to sell, personal property or services which may be used in a cemetery in connection with the burial of or the commemoration of the memory of a deceased human being, where payments for the same are made either outright or on an installment basis prior to the demise of the person or persons so purchasing them or for whom they are so purchased, unless the person or legal entity holds, controls or manages the funds, subject to the limitations and regulations prescribed in this section. This section shall apply to all cemetery companies or other legal entities that offer for sale or sell personal property or services which may be used in a cemetery in connection with the burial of, or the commemoration of the memory of, a deceased human being, but shall exclude persons holding a license under Article 13D of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.

Any cemetery company or other entity entering into a contract for the sale of personal property or services, to be used in a cemetery in connection with disposing of, or commemorating the memory of a deceased human being wherein the use of the personal property or the furnishing of services is not immediately requested or required, shall comply with the following requirements and conditions:

The cemetery company or other entity shall deposit an amount equal to sixty percent (60%) of all proceeds received on the contracts into a trust account, either in the form of an account governed by a trust agreement and handled by a corporate trustee or in the form of a passbook savings account, certificates of deposit for time certificates, or money-market certificates with a licensed and insured bank, credit union, or savings institution located in the State of North Carolina until the amount deposited equals sixty percent (60%) of the actual sale price of the property or services sold. The accounts or deposits or both shall be in the name of the cemetery company or other entity in a form which will permit withdrawals only with the participation and consent of the Cemetery Commission as required by subdivision (4) of this subsection.

All funds received on account of a contract for the sale of the personal property or services, whether the funds be received directly from the purchaser or from the sale or assignment of notes entered into by the purchase or otherwise, shall be deposited into the trust account as required by subdivision (1) of this subsection.

All deposits required herein shall be made into the trust account so established on or before the last day of the month following receipt of the funds by the cemetery company or other entity.

Withdrawals from a trust account may be made by the depositor, but only with the written approval of the Commission or officer or employee of the Commission authorized to act for the Commission. Withdrawals may be made only upon delivery of the merchandise or services for which the funds were deposited, cancellation of a contract, the presence of excess funds in the trust account, or under other circumstances deemed appropriate by the Commission. The Commission shall promulgate rules and regulations governing withdrawals from trust accounts, including time and frequency of withdrawals, payments that will be made with the withdrawals, notice to the Commission prior to withdrawals, the number and identity of persons other than the owner who are authorized by the owner to make withdrawals, the officers and employees of the Commission authorized to approve withdrawals, and any other matters necessary to implement the provisions of this subdivision. Withdrawals will not be allowed if the amount remaining in the trust account would fall below sixty percent (60%) of all proceeds received on account of contracts for the sale of the personal property or services.

If for any reason a cemetery company or other entity who has entered into a contract for the sale of personal property or services cannot or does not provide the personal property or perform the services called for by the contract after request in writing to do so, the purchaser or his heirs or assigns or duly authorized representative shall be entitled to receive the entire amount paid on the contract and any income if any, earned thereon by the trust account.

Every year after September 1, 1975, the cemetery company, the trustee or other entity shall within 75 days after the end of the calendar year, file a financial report of the trust funds with the Commission, setting forth the principal thereof, the investments and payments made, the income earned and disbursed; provided, however, that the Commission may require the cemetery, trustee, or other entity to make the additional financial reports as it may deem advisable.

Whenever a contract for the sale of personal property or services or both allocates payments to apply to one item at a time under a specific schedule, the contract shall be considered divisible. Title to each item of personal property or the right to each item of services shall pass to the purchaser upon full payment for that item regardless of the remaining balance on other items under the same contract.

Any contract for the sale of personal property or services or both shall state separate costs for each item of personal property, for each act of installation required by the contract, for opening and closing each grave space, and for each other item of services included in the contract.

All contracts for the sale of personal property or services or both must be printed in type size as required by the Truth in Lending Act, 15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq., and regulations adopted pursuant to that act.

In the event of prepayment, interest charged shall be no more than the interest earned on the unpaid balance computed on a percent per month basis for each month or part of a month up to the date of final payment. Any excess interest which has been paid by the purchaser must be refunded to him, his assigns, or his representative within 30 days after the final payment. No penalty or additional charge for prepayment may be required.

In lieu of the deposits required under subsection (b) of this section, the cemetery company or other entity may post with the Commission a good and sufficient performance bond by surety company licensed to do business in North Carolina and in an amount sufficient to cover all payments made directly or indirectly by or on account of purchasers who have not received the purchased property and services. Money received from the sale or assignment of notes entered into by the purchasers, or otherwise, shall be treated as payments made by the purchasers.

The Commission shall have the power and is required from time to time as it may deem necessary to examine the business of any cemetery company or other entity writing contracts for the sale of the property or services as herein contemplated. The written report of the examination shall be filed in the office of the Commission. Any person or entity being examined shall produce the records of the company needed for the examination.

Any provision of any contract for the sale of the personal property or the performance of services herein contemplated under which the purchaser or beneficiary waives any of the provisions of this section shall be void.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 653, s. 7.

Nothing in this section shall apply to persons or legal entities holding licenses under Article 13D of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes when engaging in activities for which a license is required under that Article.

If any report is not received within the time stipulated by the Commission or herein, the Commission may levy and collect a late filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per month for each month of delinquency.

Within 30 days following the execution of a contract for the sale of personal property or performance of services, a purchaser may cancel his contract by giving written notice to the seller. The seller may cancel the contract, upon default by purchaser, by giving written notice to the purchaser. Within 30 days of notice of cancellation, the cemetery company or other entity shall refund to purchaser the principal amount on deposit in the trust account for his benefit on any undelivered merchandise or services. This amount (no other obligations owed the purchaser by the seller) shall constitute the purchaser’s entire entitlements under the contract. The seller may not terminate the contract without complying with this subsection.

A cemetery company shall not require the purchaser or consumer of a grave space, mausoleum, or mausoleum section to purchase a vault from the cemetery company or from any other particular seller of vaults as a condition to the purchase or use of a grave space, mausoleum, or mausoleum section but may require that a casket be enclosed within a vault. A cemetery company may charge a reasonable fee not to exceed twenty dollars ($20.00) for delivery of vaults or inspection of vaults that are purchased from a person other than the cemetery company.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1979, c. 888, s. 7; 1987, c. 488, s. 7; 1991, c. 653, s. 7; 1995, c. 509, s. 135.1(j), (k); 2004-202, s. 9; 2010-102, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-202, s. 9, effective August 17, 2004, in subsection (
l
) substituted “a late filing fee” for “a penalty” and “month for each month” for “day for each day.”

Session Laws 2010-102, s. 4, effective October 1, 2010, in subdivision (b)(1), substituted “or money-market certificates” for “and/or money-market certificates,” added “credit union” following “bank,” and substituted “accounts or deposits or both” for “accounts and/or deposits”; in subdivision (b)(2), substituted “subsection” for “section”; in the third sentence in subdivision (b)(4), added “payments that will be made with the withdrawals”; in subsections (c) through (d), substituted “personal property or services or both” for “personal property and/or services”; in subsection (d), added “for opening and closing each grave space”; added subsection (n); and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

§ 65-67.
Applications for license.

Applications for renewal license must be submitted on or before July 1 each and every year in the case of an existing cemetery company. Before any sale of cemetery property in the case of a new cemetery company or a change of ownership or control as indicated in

G.S. 65-59

, an application for license must be submitted and license issued.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1.

§ 65-68.
License not assignable or transferable.

No license issued under

G.S. 65-67

shall be transferable or assignable and no licensee shall develop or operate any cemetery authorized by this Article under any name or at any location other than that contained in the application for such license.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1.

§ 65-69.
Minimum acreage; sale or disposition of cemetery lands.

Each licensee shall set aside a minimum of 30 acres of land for use by said licensee as a cemetery, and shall not sell, mortgage, lease or encumber the same.

The fee simple title, or lesser estate, in any lands owned by licensee and dedicated for use by it as a cemetery, which are contiguous, adjoining, or adjacent to the minimum of 30 acres described in subsection (a), may be sold, conveyed, or disposed of, or any part thereof, by the licensee, for use by the new owner for other purposes than as a cemetery; provided that no bodies have been previously interred therein; and provided further, that any and all titles, interests, or burial rights which may have been sold or contracted to be sold in such lands which are the subject of such sale shall be conveyed to and revested in the licensee prior to consummation of any such sale, conveyance or disposition.

Any licensee may convey and transfer to a municipality or county its real and personal property together with moneys deposited with the trustee; provided said municipality or county will accept responsibility for maintenance thereof and prior written approval of the Commission is first obtained.

The provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this section relating to the requirement for minimum acreage shall not apply to those cemeteries licensed by the Commission on or before July 1, 1967, which own or control a total of less than 30 acres of land; provided that such cemeteries shall not dispose of any of such lands. A nongovernment lien or other interest in land acquired in violation of this section is void.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, cemeteries licensed by the Commission, or initially incorporated with the North Carolina Secretary of State, between July 2, 1967, and September 1, 1975, may sell, mortgage, lease, or encumber the minimum acres of land required by subsection (a) of this section, provided notice is given to the Commission 10 days prior to the transaction, if all of the following criteria are met:

At the time of licensure or initial incorporation, the population of the county in which the cemetery is located did not exceed 45,000 people according to the appropriate federal decennial census.

Another private or public cemetery is located within a five mile radius of the cemetery that is subject to the proposed transaction.

At least 15 acres of cemetery land remain for use by the licensee as a cemetery, without mortgage, lease, or encumbrance.

The purchaser of the land shall transfer to the perpetual care fund an amount equal to ten percent (10%) of the consideration or value of the interest conveyed, on up to 15 acres sold, within 60 days of the sale.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1991, c. 653, s. 8; 2016-83, s. 1.

§ 65-70.
Construction of mausoleums and belowground crypts; trust fund for receipts from sale of preconstruction crypts; compliance requirements.

A cemetery company shall be required to start construction of that section of a mausoleum or bank of belowground crypts in which sales, contracts for sale, reservations for sales or agreements for sales are being made, within 48 months after the date of the first sale. The construction of the mausoleum section or bank of belowground crypts shall be completed within five years after the date of the first sale made; provided, however, extensions for completion, not to exceed three years, may be granted by the Commission for good reasons shown.

A cemetery company which plans to offer for sale space in a section of a mausoleum or bank of underground crypts prior to its construction shall establish a preconstruction trust account. The trust account shall be administered and operated in the same manner as the merchandise trust account provided for in

G.S. 65-66

and shall be exclusive of the merchandise trust account or the other trust accounts or funds that may be required by law. The personal representative of any purchaser of the space who dies before completion of construction shall be entitled to a refund of all moneys paid for the space including any income earned thereon.

Before a sale, contract for sale, reservation for sale or agreement for sale in the first mausoleum section or bank of underground crypts in each cemetery may be made the funds (one hundred twenty percent (120%) of construction cost) to be deposited to the preconstruction trust account shall be computed as to the section or bank of crypts and the trust account payments must be made on or before the last day of the calendar month following receipt by the cemetery company or its agent of each payment. The trust account portion of each payment shall be computed by dividing the cost of the project plus twenty percent (20%) of the cost, as computed by a licensed contractor, engineer or architect by the number of crypts in the section or bank of crypts to ascertain the cost per unit. The unit cost shall be divided by the contract sales price of each unit to obtain a percentage which shall be multiplied by the amount of each payment. The formula shall be computed as follows:Cost plus twenty percent (20%) divided by number of crypts = cost per unitCost per unit divided by contract sales price = percentagePercentage x payment received = deposit required to preconstruction trust account.

The cemetery company shall be entitled to withdraw the funds from the preconstruction trust account only after the Commission has become satisfied that construction has been completed; provided, however, that during construction of the mausoleum or bank of belowground crypts the Commission may, in its discretion, authorize a specific percentage of the funds to be withdrawn when it appears that at least an equivalent percentage of construction has been completed.

If a mausoleum section or bank of underground crypts is not completed within the time limits set out in this section the corporate trustee, if any, shall contract for and cause the project to be completed and paid therefor from the trust account funds deposited to the project’s account paying any balance, less cost and expenses, to the cemetery company. In the event there is no corporate trustee, the Commission shall appoint a committee to serve as trustees to contract for and cause the project to be completed and paid therefor from the trust account funds deposited to the project’s account paying any balance, less cost and expenses, to the cemetery company.

In lieu of the payments outlined hereunder to the preconstruction trust account the cemetery company may deliver to the Commission a good and sufficient completion or performance bond in an amount and by surety companies acceptable to the Commission.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1977, c. 686, ss. 16, 17; 1979, c. 888, s. 8; 2010-102, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-102, s. 5, effective October 1, 2010, in subsection (a), substituted “three years” for “one year”; and made minor stylistic changes throughout.

§ 65-71.
(Effective until December 1, 2021) Penalties.

Except as provided in this subsection, a person violating any provisions of this Article, of any order or rule promulgated under this Article, or of any license issued by the Commission is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each failure to deposit funds in a trust fund in accordance with this Article is a separate offense. A person who has failed to deposit funds in a trust fund in accordance with this Article and whose delinquent deposits equal or exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) is guilty of a Class I felony.

The officers and directors or persons occupying similar status or performing similar functions of any cemetery company, cemetery sales organization, cemetery management organization or cemetery broker, as defined in this Chapter, failing to make required contributions to the care and maintenance trust fund and any other trust fund or escrow account shall be liable for any offense based on the failure and upon conviction for the offense shall be punished in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 14; 1967, c. 1009, s. 13; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1991, c. 653, s. 9; 1993, c. 539, ss. 501, 1281; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 65-71.
Penalties.

Except as provided in this subsection, a person violating any provisions of this Article is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Each failure to deposit funds in a trust fund in accordance with this Article is a separate offense. A person that has failed to deposit funds in a trust fund in accordance with this Article and whose delinquent deposits equal or exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) is guilty of a Class I felony.

The officers and directors or persons occupying similar status or performing similar functions of any cemetery company, cemetery sales organization, cemetery management organization, or cemetery broker, as defined in this Chapter, failing to make required contributions to the care and maintenance trust fund and any other trust fund or escrow account are liable for any offense based on the failure and upon conviction for the offense shall be punished in the manner prescribed by law.

History.

1943, c. 644, s. 14; 1967, c. 1009, s. 13; 1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1991, c. 653, s. 9; 1993, c. 539, ss. 501, 1281; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2021-84, s. 2.

§ 65-72.
Burial without regard to race or color.

It shall be the public policy of the State that all cemetery companies or other legal entities conducting or maintaining public or private cemeteries shall sell to all applicants and bury all deceased human beings on equal terms without regard to race or color. Anything contrary hereto is void and of no legal effect. Bylaws, rules and regulations, contracts, deeds, etc., may permit designation of parts of cemeteries or burial grounds for the specific use of persons whose religious code required isolation. Any program offering free burial rights to veterans or any other person or group of persons shall not be conditioned by any requirement to purchase additional burial rights or merchandise.

Any cemetery company or other legal entity violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor, and each violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

1975, c. 768, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 502; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).

§ 65-73.
Validation of certain deeds for cemetery lots executed by suspended corporations.

Any deed for a cemetery lot or lots which was executed prior to January 1, 1979, and which would have been valid if the charter of the grantor corporation had not been suspended at the time the deed was executed, is hereby validated.

History.

1979, c. 225, s. 1.